Hawaii statutes.
§383-164 Nonliability of State.
Benefits shall be deemed to be due and payable under this chapter only to the
extent provided in this chapter, and to the extent that moneys are available
therefor to the credit of the unemployment compensation fund and the department
of labor and industrial relations shall not be liable for any amount in excess
of such sums. [L 1939, c 219, §19; RL 1945, §4298; RL 1955, §93-153; am L Sp
1959 2d, c 1, §27; HRS §383-164]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next